Wyoming statutes. Title 23 Game and Fish
Article 9. Damage Caused by Game Animals or Game Birds

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

4 Am. Jur. 2d Animals §§ 91 to 141.

3A C.J.S. Animals §§ 171, 238 to 240.

§ 23-1-901.
Owner of damaged property to report damage; claims for damages; time for filing; determination; appeal; arbitration.

Any landowner, lessee or agent whose property is being damaged by any of the big or trophy game animals or game birds of this state shall, not later than fifteen (15) days after the damage is discovered by the owner of the property or the representative of the owner, report the damage to the nearest game warden, damage control warden, supervisor or commission member.

Any landowner, lessee or agent claiming damages from the state for injury or destruction of property by big or trophy game animals or game birds of this state shall present a verified claim for the damages to the Wyoming game and fish department not later than sixty (60) days after the damage or last item of damage is discovered. The claim shall specify the damage and amount claimed. As used in this subsection, “verified claim” means a claim which the claimant has signed and sworn to be accurate before a person authorized to administer oaths.

The department shall consider the claims based upon a description of the livestock or bees damaged or killed by a trophy game animal, the damaged land, growing cultivated crops, stored crops including honey and hives, seed crops, improvements and extraordinary damage to grass. The commission is authorized to establish by rule, methods, factors and formulas to be used for determining the amount to compensate any landowner, lessee or agent for livestock damaged as a result of, missing as a result of, or killed by trophy game animals. Claims shall be investigated by the department and rejected or allowed within ninety (90) days after submission, and paid in the amount determined to be due. In the event the department fails to act within ninety (90) days, the claim, including interest based on local bank preferred rates, shall be deemed to have been allowed. No award shall be allowed to any landowner who has not permitted hunting on his property during authorized hunting seasons. Any person failing to comply with any provision of this section is barred from making any claim against the department for damages. Any claimant aggrieved by the decision of the department may appeal to the commission within thirty (30) days after receipt of the decision of the department as provided by rules of practice and procedure promulgated by the commission. The commission shall review the department decision at its next meeting following receipt of notice of request for review. The commission shall review the investigative report of the department, and it may approve, modify or reverse the decision of the department.

Within ninety (90) days after receiving notice of the decision of the commission, the claimant may in writing to the department call for arbitration. Within fifteen (15) days after the department receives the call for arbitration, the claimant and the department shall each appoint a disinterested arbitrator who is an elector residing in the county where the damage occurred and notify each other of the appointment. Within twenty (20) days after their appointment, the two (2) arbitrators shall appoint a third arbitrator possessing the same qualifications. If the third arbitrator is not appointed within the time prescribed, the judge of the district court of the county or the court commissioner in the absence of the judge shall appoint the third arbitrator upon the application of either arbitrator.

At least twenty (20) days before the hearing, the board of arbitrators shall provide the claimant and department notice of the time and place in the county when and where the parties will be heard and the claim investigated and decided by the board. A written copy of the decision shall be promptly served upon each party. Within ten (10) days after receipt of the decision, either party may apply to the board for modification of the decision under W.S.

1-36-111

. Either party may apply to the district court for vacation of a decision under W.S. 1-36-114(a) or correction or modification of a decision under W.S.

1-36-115

within thirty (30) days after receipt of the decision or within twenty (20) days after action by the board on an application for modification under W.S.

1-36-111

.

If no applications under subsection (e) of this section are made after receipt of the decision, the commission shall promptly pay the amount, if any, including interest based on local bank preferred rates, awarded by the board. Within thirty (30) days after the award is final, the board’s reasonable service and expense charges shall be paid by:

The claimant if the award is no greater than the amount originally authorized by the commission;

Otherwise, the commission.

For purposes of this section, eligibility for damage compensation shall include gray wolves located in:

The area described in W.S. 23-1-101(a)(xii)(B)(I) or (II) regardless of the date on which the damage occurs;

Subject to subsection (h) of this section, an area of land designated by the commission in rule which is adjacent to the area described in W.S. 23-1-101(a)(xii)(B)(I) or (II) regardless of the date on which the damage occurs.

The commission shall establish in rule a process for persons to request that an area of land adjacent to the area described in W.S. 23-1-101(a)(xii)(B)(I) or (II) be designated as an area where property owners are eligible for damage compensation for damage caused by gray wolves. The rules shall provide that:

The adjacent area of land is outside the area described in W.S. 23-1-101(a)(xii)(B)(I) or (II);

The adjacent area of land is part of a contiguous tract of land a portion of which is currently located within the boundaries described in W.S. 23-1-101(a)(xii)(B)(I) or (II);

The adjacent area of land is privately owned;

The private landowner of the adjacent area of land consents to the designation;

The designation of the adjacent area of land shall not subtract from or diminish the area described in W.S. 23-1-101(a)(xii)(B)(I) or (II).

History.

Laws 1939, ch. 65, § 45; 1943, ch. 112, § 8; 1945, ch. 155, § 1; C.S. 1945, § 47-301; Laws 1955, ch. 44, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 23-117; Laws 1971, ch. 60, § 1; 1973, ch. 249, § 1; Rev. W.S. 1957, § 23.1-32; Laws 1980, ch. 37, § 1; 1985, ch. 151, § 1; 1996, ch. 33, § 1; 2003, ch. 143, § 1; 2012, ch. 25, § 1; 2017 ch. 198, § 1, effective July 1, 2017.

Cross references. —

For provision authorizing landowner to kill beaver causing damage, see §

23-3-114

.

For provision authorizing landowner to kill bear, mountain lion, bobcat, weasel, squirrels or muskrat damaging property, see §

23-3-115

.

As to Uniform Arbitration Act, see §§

1-36-101

to

1-36-119

.

The 2012 amendment,

added (g).

Laws 2012, ch. 25, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2012.

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, in (g) substituted “eligibility for damage compensation” for “trophy game animals” near the beginning, in (g)(i) substituted “23-1-101(a)(xii)(B)(I) or (II)” for “23-1-101(a)(xii)(B)(II)”, added (g)(ii); added (h); and made related changes.

Landowner cannot be compelled to waive constitutional rightto protect property from animals. —

A landowner should not be compelled to waive his constitutional rights by filing a claim for damages, perhaps every month, every two months, every year, or at other intervals, and recover damages caused by wild game perhaps after protracted litigation. Cross v. State, 370 P.2d 371,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 78

(Wyo. 1962) (dismissing complaint charging defendant with killing two moose out of season and without a license or permit, since the moose were destroying defendant's property).

Inapplicable to disease damage. —

This section is unambiguous and does not apply to a landowner's claim for livestock damages allegedly caused by a contagious disease transmitted by state-owned elk. Consequently, such a claim is not legally cognizable and, therefore, not compensable under the provisions of this section. Parker Land & Cattle Co. v. Wyoming Game & Fish Comm'n, 845 P.2d 1040,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1993), reh'g denied,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. Feb. 24, 1993).

Bison damage not cognizable. —

Bison is neither a big game animal nor a trophy game animal under the provisions of §

23-1-101

: as such, a claim alleging livestock damage from bison is not legally cognizable. Parker Land & Cattle Co. v. Wyoming Game & Fish Comm'n, 845 P.2d 1040,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1993), reh'g denied,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. Feb. 24, 1993).

Expense of fence not a claim for damages. —

Arbitrators exceeded their authority when they compensated a landowner for the construction of a stack yard fence the landowner had constructed as a measure to avoid further damage by wildlife; this expense was not a claim for damage within this section. Wyoming Game & Fish Comm'n v. Thornock, 851 P.2d 1300,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1993).

Applied

in

Wyoming Game & Fish Comm'n v. Latham, 347 P.2d 1008,

1960 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1960).

Quoted

in

Wyoming Game & Fish Comm'n v. Smith, 773 P.2d 941,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Wyo. 1989).

Stated

in

Steil v. Smith, 901 P.2d 395,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 1995).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Governmental Immunity from Damage Actions in Wyoming — Part II,” see VII Land & Water L. Rev. 617 (1972).

For article, “Wyoming Land and the Law One Hundred Years After Statehood — A Perspective,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 33 (1991).

For article, “Bison, Brucellosis, and Law in the Greater Yellowstone Ecosystem,” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 1 (1993).

For case note, “Wildlife — Private Property Damage Law — Once Upon a Time in Wyoming There was Room for Millions of Cattle and Enough Habitat for Every Species of Game to Find a Luxurious Existence. In the Aftermath of Parker, Can We All Still Get Along?
Parker Land and Cattle Company v. Wyoming Game and Fish Commission, 845 P.2d 1040,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1993),” see XXIX Land & Water L. Rev. 89 (1994).

For comments, “Are Ranchers Legitimately Trying to Save Their Hides or Are They Just Crying Wolf—What Issues Must Be Resolved Before Wolf Reintroduction to Yellowstone National Park Proceeds?,” see XXIX Land & Water L. Rev. 417 (1994).

For comment, “The Grizzly State of the Endangered Species Act: An Analysis of the ESA's Effectiveness in Conserving the Yellowstone Grizzly Bear Population,” see XXIX Land & Water L. Rev. 467 (1994).

For article, “The Endangered Species Act and Private Property,” see XXXII Land & Water Rev. 479 (1997).